Alabama, session 2026rs, SB243.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 45-37-233, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§45-37-233
(a) This section shall be known as the Pistol Permit
Reduction Act of 1999 for Jefferson County.
(b) In Jefferson County, the total fee for issuance of
a one-year permit to carry a pistol as provided by Section
13A-11-75 shall be seven dollars and fifty cents ($7.50) per
year. The fee shall be paid by the sheriff to the county
treasurer, and the county treasurer shall distribute the seven
dollars and fifty cents ($7.50) as follows:
(1) Four dollars and fifty cents ($4.50) shall be
distributed to the retirement system established by Article
12.
(2) Fifty cents ($.50) shall be distributed to the
Jefferson County Sheriff's Fund.
Page 1

Jefferson County Sheriff's Fund.
SB243 INTRODUCED
(3)a. Two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) shall be
distributed to a fund in the county treasury designated the
Jefferson County Legislative Delegation Office Fund to be
further distributed as provided herein.
b. Any amounts previously distributed and not expended
pursuant to this subdivision shall be transferred to the fund.
c. Any amounts in the fund over one hundred twenty
thousand dollars ($120,000) on April 10, 2014, shall
thereafter be distributed to the public school systems in the
county to be used for the operation of the public schools,
including, but not limited to, being used for school security,
on a pro rata basis based on the number of school students in
each school system, including the City of Gardendale School
System, to the total number of students in the county based on
enrollment numbers for the 2013-2014 school year as reported
to the State Department of Education.
d. Notwithstanding the distribution provided in the
preceding sentenceparagraph c., in the event the City of
Gardendale School System has not been officially separated
from the Jefferson County School System at the time of any
distribution provided for therein, the portion of the funds
that would have been distributed to the City of Gardendale
School System based on the distribution formula provided
therein shall be distributed to the City of Gardendale to be
used only for the operation of the Gardendale School System
upon separation.
e. The remaining balance in the fund and any amounts
accruing pursuant to this subdivision after the distribution
Page 2

accruing pursuant to this subdivision after the distribution
SB243 INTRODUCED
provided in the preceding sentence paragraph d. or the portion
needed thereof shall be spent for the operation of a
legislative office located in Birmingham.
(c) The total fee for issuance of a five-year permit to
carry a pistol as provided by Section 13A-11-75 shall be
thirty-seven dollars and fifty cents ($37.50). The fee shall
be paid by the sheriff to the county treasurer and the county
treasurer shall distribute the fee in the same proportions as
provided in subsection (b)."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3